Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-2904
Act, how cited.

Sections 8-2904 to 8-2909 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Protection of Vulnerable Adults from Financial Exploitation Act.

Laws 2021, LB297, § 1.